Maryland, session 2025, SB0527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
4–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Law enforcement official” means:
(7) a City of Hagerstown fire and explosive investigator as defined in §
2–208.5 of the Criminal Procedure Article; [or]
(8) a Howard County fire and explosive investigator as defined in § 2–208.6
of the Criminal Procedure Article; OR
(9) A CITY OF SALISBURY FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR AS
DEFINED IN § 2–208.7 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
Article – Criminal Procedure

SENATE BILL 527 3
2–208.
(a) (1) The State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection
assistant of the Office of the State Fire Marshal may arrest a person without a warrant if
the State Fire Marshal or assistant has probable cause to believe:
(i) a felony that is a crime listed in paragraph (2) of this subsection
has been committed or attempted; and
(ii) the person to be arrested has committed or attempted to commit
the felony whether or not in the presence or within the view of the State Fire Marshal or
assistant.
(2) The powers of arrest set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection apply
only to the crimes listed in this paragraph and to attempts, conspiracies, and solicitations
to commit these crimes:
(i) murder under § 2–201(4) of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) setting fire to a dwelling or occupied structure under § 6–102 of
the Criminal Law Article;
(iii) setting fire to a structure under § 6–103 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(iv) a crime that relates to destructive devices under § 4–503 of the
Criminal Law Article; and
(v) making a false statement or rumor as to a destructive device
under § 9–504 of the Criminal Law Article.
(b) (1) The State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection
assistant of the Office of the State Fire Marshal may arrest a person without a warrant if
the State Fire Marshal or assistant has probable cause to believe:
(i) the person has committed a crime listed in paragraph (2) of this
subsection; and
(ii) unless the person is arrested immediately, the person:
1. may not be apprehended;
2. may cause physical injury or property damage to another;
or
3. may tamper with, dispose of, or destroy evidence.

SENATE BILL 527
(2) The crimes referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection are:
(i) a crime that relates to a device that is constructed to represent a
destructive device under § 9–505 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) malicious burning in the first or second degree under § 6–104 or
§ 6–105 of the Criminal Law Article;
(iii) burning the contents of a trash container under § 6–108 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(iv) making a false alarm of fire under § 9–604 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(v) a crime that relates to burning or attempting to burn property as
part of a religious or ethnic crime under § 10–304 or § 10–305 of the Criminal Law Article;
(vi) a crime that relates to interference, obstruction, or false
representation of fire and safety personnel under § 6–602 or § 7–402 of the Public Safety
Article; and
(vii) threatening arson or attempting, causing, aiding, counseling, or
procuring arson in the first or second degree or malicious burning in the first or second
degree under Title 6, Subtitle 1 of the Criminal Law Article.
(c) (1) The State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection
assistant in the Office of the State Fire Marshal may act under the authority granted by §
2–102 of this title to police officers as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) When acting under the authority granted by § 2–102 of this title, the
State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection assistant in the Office of the
State Fire Marshal has the powers of arrest set forth in §§ 2–202, 2–203, and 2–204 of this
subtitle.
(d) (1) The State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection
assistant in the Office of the State Fire Marshal who acts under the authority granted by
this section shall notify the following persons of an investigation or enforcement action:
(i) 1. the chief of police, if any, or chief’s designee, when in a
municipal corporation;
2. the Police Commissioner or Police Commissioner’s
designee, when in Baltimore City;
3. the chief of police or chief’s designee, when in a county
with a county police department, except Baltimore City;

SENATE BILL 527 5
4. the sheriff or sheriff’s designee, when in a county without
a county police department;
5. the Secretary of Natural Resources or Secretary’s
designee, when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of the
Department of Natural Resources; or
6. the respective chief of police or chief’s designee, when on
property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of the Maryland Transportation
Authority, Maryland Aviation Administration, or Maryland Port Administration; and
(ii) the Department of State Police barrack commander or
commander’s designee, unless there is an agreement otherwise with the Department of
State Police.
(2) When the State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and
inspection assistant in the Office of the State Fire Marshal participates in a joint
investigation with officials from another state, federal, or local law enforcement unit, the
State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection assistant in the Office of the
State Fire Marshal shall give the notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
reasonably in advance.
(e) A State Fire Marshal or a full–time investigative and inspection assistant in
the Office of the State Fire Marshal who acts under the authority granted by this section:
(1) has the same immunities from liability and exemptions as a State
Police officer in addition to any other immunities and exemptions to which the State Fire
Marshal or full–time investigative and inspection assistant is otherwise entitled; and
(2) remains at all times and for all purposes an employee of the employing
unit.
(f) (1) This section does not impair a right of arrest otherwise existing under
the Code.
(2) This section does not deprive a person of the right to receive a citation
for a traffic violation as provided in the Maryland Vehicle Law or a criminal violation as
provided by law or the Maryland Rules.
2–208.7.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO:

SENATE BILL 527
(1) IS ASSIGNED FULL–TIME TO THE FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE
INVESTIGATIONS SECTION OF THE CITY OF SALISBURY FIRE MARSHAL’S OFFICE
AND IS A PAID EMPLOYEE;
(2) HAS THE RANK OF DEPUTY FIRE MARSHALL OR HIGHER;
(3) HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED A TRAINING PROGRAM FROM A
POLICE TRAINING SCHOOL APPROVED BY THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING AND
STANDARDS COMMISSION ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(4) IS CERTIFIED BY THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING AND
STANDARDS COMMISSION.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A FIRE AND
EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR HAS THE SAME AUTHORITY GRANTED TO THE STATE
FIRE MARSHAL OR A FULL–TIME INVESTIGATIVE AND INSPECTION ASSISTANT OF
THE OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL UNDER § 2–208 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) WHILE OPERATING IN THE CITY OF SALISBURY; AND
(2) WHILE OPERATING OUTSIDE THE CITY OF SALISBURY IF:
(I) THE FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR IS
PARTICIPATING IN A JOINT INVESTIGATION WITH OFFICIALS FROM ANOTHER STATE,
FEDERAL, OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT AND AT LEAST ONE OF THE OTHER
OFFICIALS HAS LOCAL JURISDICTION;
(II) THE FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR IS RENDERING
ASSISTANCE TO ANOTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER;
(III) THE FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR IS ACTING AT THE
REQUEST OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER; OR
(IV) AN EMERGENCY EXISTS.
(C) THE CITY OF SALISBURY FIRE CHIEF:
(1) MAY LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE
INVESTIGATOR UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) SHALL EXPRESS THE LIMITATION IN A WRITTEN POLICY.

SENATE BILL 527 7
Article – Public Safety
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (2) “Law enforcement officer” does not include:
(x) a Howard County fire and explosive investigator as defined in §
2–208.6 of the Criminal Procedure Article; [or]
(xi) the Chief of Police of the police department of the Johns Hopkins
University established in accordance with Title 24, Subtitle 12 of the Education Article; OR
(XII) THE CITY OF SALISBURY FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE
INVESTIGATOR AS DEFINED IN § 2–208.7 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) (2) “Police officer” includes:
(ix) a City of Hagerstown fire and explosive investigator as defined
in § 2–208.5 of the Criminal Procedure Article; [and]
(x) a Howard County fire and explosive investigator as defined in §
2–208.6 of the Criminal Procedure Article; AND
(XI) A CITY OF SALISBURY FIRE AND EXPLOSIVE INVESTIGATOR
AS DEFINED IN § 2–208.7 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.